District of Columbia statutes.
1-819.01

Coordination between Secretary, Trustee, and District Government.

The Secretary, Trustee, and District Government shall carry out responsibilities under this chapter and under the contract in a manner which promotes the cost-effective and efficient administration of benefit payments under the District Retirement Programs, and in a manner which avoids unnecessary interruptions and delays in paying individuals the full benefits to which they are entitled under such Programs.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 729, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11091
renumbered as § 11081, Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3966, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(1), (2)

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 1-817.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-769.1.

Editor's Notes

Former 1-819.01 has been recodified as § 1-821.01.